Utah statutes.
63I-3-202.   Vacancies -- Person filling a vacancy begins serving new term.

(1)  If a member appointed by the speaker of the House resigns, is unable to serve, or is no longer a member of the House of Representatives, the vacancy shall be filled by the speaker of the House, as provided in Subsection 63I-3-201(2)(a).

(2)  If a member appointed by the president of the Senate resigns, is unable to serve, or is no longer a member of the Senate, the vacancy shall be filled by the president of the Senate, as provided in Subsection 63I-3-201(2)(b).

(3)  If a member appointed by the governor resigns or is unable to serve, the vacancy shall be filled by the governor, as provided in Subsection 63I-3-201(2)(c).

(4)  If a member appointed by the nine commission members appointed under Subsection 63I-3-201(3) resigns or is unable to serve, the vacancy shall be filled by those nine commission members as provided in Subsection 63I-3-201(3).

(5)  A person appointed to fill a vacancy under this section does not serve the remaining unexpired term of the member that the person is replacing but begins serving a new term.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

